California statutes. Corporations Code
(d) If the surviving entity is a foreign partnership or foreign other business entity, the merger shall become effective in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity is organized, but shall be effective as to any domestic disappearing partnership as of the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction in accordance with Section 16912.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16914.

(a) When a merger takes effect, all of the following apply:

(1) The separate existence of the disappearing partnerships and disappearing other business entities ceases and the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity shall succeed, without other transfer, act, or deed, to all the rights and property whether real, personal, or mixed, of each of the disappearing partnerships and disappearing other business entities and shall be subject to all the debts and liabilities of each in the same manner as if the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity had itself incurred them.

(2) All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of each of the constituent partnerships and constituent other business entities shall be preserved unimpaired and may be enforced against the surviving partnership or the surviving other business entity to the same extent as if the debt, liability, or duty that gave rise to that lien had been incurred or contracted by it, provided that those liens upon the property of a disappearing partnership or disappearing other business entity shall be limited to the property affected thereby immediately before the time the merger is effective.

(3) Any action or proceeding pending by or against any disappearing partnership or disappearing other business entity may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity, or the
 surviving partnership or surviving other business entity may be proceeded against or be substituted in the disappearing partnership’s or the disappearing other business entity’s place.

(b) (1) Unless a certificate of merger has been filed to effect the merger, the surviving foreign entity shall promptly notify the Secretary of State of the mailing address of its agent for service of process and its principal office, and of any change of address. To enforce an obligation of a partnership that has merged with a foreign partnership or foreign other business entity, the Secretary of State shall only be the agent for service of process in an action or proceeding against the surviving foreign partnership or foreign other business entity, if the agent designated for the service of process for that entity is a natural person and
 cannot be located with due diligence or if the agent is a corporation and no person to whom delivery may be made can be located with due diligence, or if no agent has been designated and if no one of the officers, partners, managers, members, or agents of the entity can be located after diligent search, and it is so shown by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court. The court then may make an order that service be made by personal delivery to the Secretary of State or to an assistant or deputy Secretary of State of two copies of the process together with two copies of the order, and the order shall set forth an address to which the process shall be sent by the Secretary of State. Service in this manner is deemed complete on the 10th day after delivery of the process to the Secretary of State.

(2) Upon receipt of the process and order and
 the fee set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 12197 of the Government Code, the Secretary of State shall give notice to the entity of the service of the process by forwarding by certified mail, return receipt requested, a copy of the process and order to the address specified in the order.

(3) The Secretary of State shall keep a record of all process served upon the Secretary of State and shall record therein the time of service and the Secretary of State’s action with respect thereto. The certificate of the Secretary of State, under the Secretary of State’s official seal, certifying to the receipt of process, the giving of notice thereof to the entity, and the forwarding of the process, shall be competent and prima facie evidence of the matters stated therein.

(c) A partner of the surviving partnership or surviving limited partnership, a member of the surviving limited liability company, a shareholder of the surviving corporation, or a holder of equity securities of the surviving other business entity, is liable for all of the following:

(1) All obligations of a party to the merger for which that person was personally liable before the merger.

(2) All other obligations of the surviving entity incurred before the merger by a party to the merger, but those obligations may be satisfied only out of property of the entity.

(3) All obligations of the surviving entity incurred after the merger takes effect, but those obligations may be satisfied only out of property of the
 entity if that person is a limited partner, a shareholder in a corporation, or, unless expressly provided otherwise in the articles of organization or other constituent documents, a member of a limited liability company or a holder of equity securities in a surviving other business entity.

(d) If the obligations incurred before the merger by a party to the merger are not satisfied out of the property of the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity, the general partners of that party immediately before the effective date of the merger, to the extent that party was a partnership or a limited partnership, shall contribute the amount necessary to satisfy that party’s obligations to the surviving entity in the manner provided in Section 16807 or in the limited partnership act of the jurisdiction in which the party was formed, as
 the case may be, as if the merged party were dissolved.

(e) A partner of a domestic disappearing partnership who does not vote in favor of the merger and does not agree to become a partner, member, shareholder, or holder of interest or equity securities of the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity shall have the right to dissociate from the partnership as of the date the merger takes effect. Within 10 days after the approval of the merger by the partners as required under this article, each domestic disappearing partnership shall send notice of the approval of the merger to each partner that has not approved the merger, accompanied by a copy of Section 16701 and a brief description
 of the procedure to be followed under that section if the partner wishes to dissociate from the partnership. A partner that desires to dissociate from a disappearing partnership shall send written notice of that dissociation within 30 days after the date of the notice of the approval of the merger. The disappearing partnership shall cause the partner’s interest in the entity to be purchased under Section 16701. The surviving entity is bound under Section 16702 by an act of a general partner dissociated under this subdivision, and the partner is liable under Section 16703 for transactions entered into by the surviving entity after the merger takes effect. The dissociation of a partner in connection with a merger pursuant to the terms of this subdivision shall not be deemed a wrongful dissociation under Section 16602.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 109.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16915.

(a) In a merger involving a domestic partnership, in which another partnership or a foreign other business entity is a party, but in which no other domestic other business entity is a party, the surviving partnership or surviving foreign other business entity may file with the Secretary of State a statement that one or more partnerships have merged into the surviving partnership or surviving foreign other business entity, or that one or more partnerships or foreign other business entities have merged into the surviving domestic partnership. A statement of merger shall contain the following:

(1) The name of each partnership or foreign other business entity that is a party to the
 merger.

(2) The name of the surviving entity into which the other partnerships or foreign other business entities were merged.

(3) The street address of the surviving entity’s principal office and of an office in this state, if any.

(4) Whether the surviving entity is a partnership or a foreign other business entity, specifying the type of the entity.

(b) In a merger involving a domestic partnership in which a domestic other business entity is also a party, after approval of the merger by the constituent partnerships and any constituent other business entities, the constituent partnerships and constituent other business entities shall file a certificate of merger in
 the office of, and on a form prescribed by, the Secretary of State, but if the surviving entity is a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation in a merger in which a domestic corporation is a constituent party, the surviving corporation shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a copy of the agreement of merger and attachments required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 1113. The certificate of merger shall be executed and acknowledged by each domestic constituent partnership by two partners (unless a lesser number is provided in the partnership agreement) and by each foreign constituent partnership by one or more partners, and by each constituent other business entity by those persons required to execute the certificate of merger by the laws under which the constituent other business entity is organized. The certificate of merger shall set forth all of the
 following:

(1) The names and the Secretary of State’s file numbers, if any, of each of the constituent partnerships and constituent other business entities, separately identifying the disappearing partnerships and disappearing other business entities and the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity.

(2) If a vote of the partners was required under Section 16911, a statement that the principal terms of the agreement of merger were approved by a vote of the partners, which equaled or exceeded the vote required.

(3) If the surviving entity is a domestic partnership and not an other business entity, any change to the information set forth in any filed statement of partnership authority of the surviving partnership
 resulting from the merger, including any change in the name of the surviving partnership resulting from the merger. The filing of a certificate of merger setting forth any changes to any
 filed statement of partnership authority of the surviving partnership shall have the effect of the filing of a certificate of amendment of the statement of partnership authority by the surviving partnership, and the surviving partnership need not file a certificate of amendment under Section 16105 to reflect those changes.

(4) The future effective date or time (which shall be a date or time certain not more than 90 days subsequent to the date of filing) of the merger, if the merger is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of merger with the office of the Secretary of State.

(5) If the surviving entity is an other business entity or a foreign partnership, the full name, type of entity, legal jurisdiction in which the entity was organized and by whose laws its
 internal affairs are governed, and the address of the principal place of business of the entity.

(6) Any other information required to be stated in the certificate of merger by the laws under which each constituent other business entity is organized.

(c) A statement of merger or a certificate of merger, as is applicable under subdivision (a) or (b), shall have the effect of the filing of a cancellation for each disappearing partnership of any statement of partnership authority filed by it, and shall have the effect of filing the notice of cessation required by Section 16954 or 16960, if applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 110.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16915.5.

(a) Upon merger pursuant to this article, a surviving domestic or foreign partnership or other business entity shall be deemed to have assumed the liability of each disappearing domestic or foreign partnership or other business entity that is taxed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of, or under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of, Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the following:

(1) To prepare and file, or to cause to be prepared and filed, tax and information returns otherwise required of that disappearing entity as specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18501) of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) To pay any tax liability determined to be due.

(b) If the surviving entity is a domestic limited liability company, domestic corporation, or registered limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability company, foreign limited liability partnership, or foreign corporation that is registered or qualified to do business in California, the Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 38.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

16916.

(a) Whenever a domestic or foreign partnership or other business entity having any real property in this state merges with another partnership or other business entity pursuant to the laws of this state or of the state or place in which any constituent partnership or constituent other business entity was organized, and the laws of the state or place of organization (including this state) of any disappearing partnership or disappearing other business entity provide substantially that the making and filing of a statement of merger, agreement of merger or certificate of merger vests in the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity all the real property of any disappearing partnership and disappearing other business entity, the filing for record in the office of the county record of any county in this state in which any of the real property of the disappearing partnership or disappearing other business entity is located of either (1) a certificate of merger or agreement of merger certified by the Secretary of State, or other certificate prescribed by the Secretary of State, or (2) a copy of the statement of merger, agreement of merger or certificate of merger, certified by the Secretary of State or an authorized public official of the state or place pursuant to the laws of which the merger is effected, shall evidence record ownership in the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity of all interest of that disappearing partnership or disappearing other business entity in and to the real property located in that county.

(b) A filed and, if appropriate, recorded statement of merger, executed and declared to be accurate pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16105, stating the name of a partnership or other business entity that is a party to the merger in whose name property was held before the merger and the name of the surviving entity, but not containing all of the other information required by Section 16915, operates with respect to the partnerships or other business entities named to the extent provided in subdivision (a).

(c) Recording of the certificate of merger in accordance with subdivision (a) shall create, in favor of bona fide purchasers or encumbrancers for value, a conclusive presumption that the merger was validly completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16917.

This article is not exclusive. Partnerships, other than limited liability partnerships, may be converted or merged in any other manner provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Limited Liability Partnerships [16951. - 16962.]

16951.

For purposes of this chapter, the only types of limited liability partnerships that shall be recognized are a registered limited liability partnership and a foreign limited liability partnership, as defined in Section 16101. No registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership may render professional limited liability partnership services in this state except through licensed persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16952.

The name of a registered limited liability partnership shall contain the words “Registered Limited Liability Partnership” or “Limited Liability Partnership” or one of the abbreviations “L.L.P.,” “LLP,” “R.L.L.P.,” or “RLLP” as the last words or letters of its name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16953.

(a) To become a registered limited liability partnership, a partnership, other than a limited partnership, shall file with the Secretary of State a registration, executed by one or more partners authorized to execute a registration, stating all of the following:

(1) The name of the partnership.

(2) The street address of its principal office.

(3) The mailing address of its principal office, if different from the street address.

(4) The name and street address of the agent for service of process on the
 limited liability partnership in California in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 16309.

(5) A brief statement of the business in which the partnership engages.

(6) Any other matters that the partnership determines to include.

(7) That the partnership is registering as a registered limited liability partnership.

(b) The registration shall be accompanied by a fee as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 12189 of the Government Code.

(c) The Secretary of State shall register as a registered limited liability partnership any partnership that submits a completed registration with the required
 fee.

(d) The Secretary of State may cancel the filing of the registration if a check or other remittance accepted in payment of the filing fee is not paid upon presentation. Within 90 days of receiving written notification that the item presented for payment has not been honored for payment, the Secretary of State shall give a first written notice of the applicability of this section to the agent for service of process or to the person submitting the instrument. Thereafter, if the amount has not been paid by cashier’s check or equivalent, the Secretary of State shall give a second written notice of cancellation and the cancellation shall thereupon be effective. The second notice shall be given 20 days or more after the first
 notice.

(e) A partnership becomes a registered limited liability partnership at the time of the filing of the initial registration with the Secretary of State or at any later date or time specified in the registration and the payment of the fee required by subdivision (b). A partnership continues as a registered limited liability partnership until a notice that it is no longer a registered limited liability partnership has been filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16954 or, if applicable, until it has been dissolved and finally wound up. The status of a partnership as a registered limited liability partnership and the liability of a partner of the registered limited liability partnership shall not be adversely affected by errors or subsequent changes in the information stated in a registration under subdivision (a) or
 an amended registration or notice under Section 16954.

(f) The fact that a registration or amended registration pursuant to this section is on file with the Secretary of State is notice that the partnership is a registered limited liability partnership and of those other facts contained therein that are required to be set forth in the registration or amended registration.

(g) The Secretary of State shall provide a form for a registration under subdivision (a), which shall include the form for confirming compliance with the optional security requirement pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16956. The Secretary of State shall include with instructional materials provided in conjunction with the form for a registration under subdivision (a) a notice that filing the registration
 will obligate the limited liability partnership to pay an annual tax for that taxable year to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 17948 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. That notice shall be updated annually to specify the dollar amount of the tax.

(h) A limited liability partnership providing professional limited liability partnership services in this state shall comply with all statutory and administrative registration or filing requirements of the state board, commission, or other agency that prescribes the rules and regulations governing the particular profession in which the partnership proposes to engage, pursuant to the applicable provisions of the Business and Professions Code relating to that profession. The state board, commission, or other agency shall not disclose, unless compelled by a subpoena or other order of a
 court of competent jurisdiction, any information it receives in the course of evaluating the compliance of a limited liability partnership with applicable statutory and administrative registration or filing requirements, provided that nothing in this section shall be
 construed to prevent a state board, commission, or other agency from disclosing the manner in which the limited liability partnership has complied with the requirements of Section 16956, or the compliance or noncompliance by the limited liability partnership with any other requirements of the state board, commission, or other agency.

(i) An agent designated for service of process may deliver to the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing, a signed and acknowledged written statement of resignation as an agent for service of process containing the name of the limited liability partnership and the Secretary of State’s file number of the limited liability partnership, the name of the resigning agent for service of process, and a statement that the agent is resigning. On filing of the
 statement of resignation, the authority of the agent to act in that capacity shall cease and the Secretary of State shall mail or otherwise provide written notice of the filing of the statement of resignation to the limited liability partnership at its principal office.

(j) The resignation of an agent may be effective if, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State containing the name of the limited liability partnership and Secretary of State’s file number for the limited liability partnership and the name of the agent for service of process, the agent disclaims having been properly appointed as the agent.

(k) If an individual who has been designated agent for service of process dies, resigns, or no longer resides in the state or if the corporate agent for that purpose
 resigns, dissolves, withdraws from the state, forfeits its right to transact intrastate business, has its corporate rights, powers, and privileges suspended, or ceases to exist, the limited liability partnership shall promptly file an
 amended registration as a limited liability partnership designating a new agent.

(l) The Secretary of State may destroy or otherwise dispose of any statement of resignation filed pursuant to this section after a new registration is filed pursuant to this section replacing the agent for service of process that has resigned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 111.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16954.

(a) The registration of a registered limited liability partnership may be amended by an amended registration executed by one or more partners authorized to execute an amended registration and filed with the Secretary of State, as soon as reasonably practical after any information set forth in the registration or previously filed amended registration becomes inaccurate or to add information to the registration or amended registration.

(b) If a registered limited liability partnership ceases to be a registered limited liability partnership, it shall file with the Secretary of State a notice, executed by one or more partners authorized to
 execute the notice, that it is no longer a registered limited liability partnership. The notice shall state that a final annual tax return, as described by Section 17948.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, has been or will be filed with the Franchise Tax Board, as required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) An amendment pursuant to subdivision (a) and a notice pursuant to subdivision (b) shall each be accompanied by a fee as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 12189 of the Government Code.

(d) The Secretary of State shall provide forms for an amended registration under subdivision (a) and a notice under subdivision (b).

(e) A notice of cessation,
 signed pursuant to subdivision (b), shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the cessation.

(f) A certificate of merger or the agreement of merger shall have the effect of the filing of a notice of termination for each disappearing registered limited liability partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 112.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16955.

(a) A domestic partnership, other than a limited partnership, may convert to a registered limited liability partnership by the vote of the partners possessing a majority of the interests of its partners in the current profits of the partnership or by a different vote as may be required in its partnership agreement.

(b) When such a conversion takes effect, all of the following apply:

(1) All property, real and personal, tangible and intangible, of the converting partnership remains vested in the converted registered limited liability partnership.

(2) All debts, obligations, liabilities, and
 penalties of the converting partnership continue as debts, obligations, liabilities, and penalties of the converted registered limited liability partnership.

(3) Any action, suit, or proceeding, civil or criminal, then pending by or against the converting partnership may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred.

(4) To the extent provided in the agreement of conversion and in this chapter, the partners of a partnership shall continue as partners in the converted registered limited liability partnership.

(5) A partnership that has been converted to a registered limited liability partnership pursuant to this chapter is the same person that existed prior to the conversion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 26.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16956.

(a) At the time of registration pursuant to Section 16953, in the case of a registered limited liability partnership, and Section 16959, in the case of a foreign limited liability partnership, and at all times during which those partnerships shall transact intrastate business, every registered limited liability partnership and foreign limited liability partnership, as the case may be, shall be required to provide security for claims against it as follows:

(1) For claims based upon acts, errors, or omissions arising out of the practice of public accountancy, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing accountancy services shall comply with
 one, or pursuant to subdivision (b) some combination, of the following:

(A) Maintaining a policy or policies of insurance against liability imposed on or against it by law for damages arising out of claims; however, the total aggregate limit of liability under the policy or policies of insurance for partnerships with five or fewer licensed persons shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for partnerships with more than five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of insurance shall be obtained for each additional licensee; however, the maximum amount of insurance is not required to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in any one designated period, less amounts paid in defending, settling, or discharging claims as set forth in this subparagraph.
 The policy or policies may be issued on a claims-made or occurrence basis, and shall cover: (i) in the case of a claims-made policy, claims initially asserted in the designated period, and (ii) in the case of an occurrence policy, occurrences during the designated period. For purposes of this subparagraph, “designated period” means a policy year or any other period designated in the policy that is not greater than 12 months. The impairment or exhaustion of the aggregate limit of liability by amounts paid under the policy in connection with the settlement, discharge, or defense of claims applicable to a designated period shall not require the partnership to acquire additional insurance coverage for that designated period. The policy or policies of insurance may be in a form reasonably available in the commercial insurance market and may be subject to those terms, conditions, exclusions, and
 endorsements that are typically contained in those policies. A policy or policies of insurance maintained pursuant to this subparagraph may be subject to a deductible or self-insured retention.

Upon the dissolution and winding up of the partnership, the partnership shall, with respect to any insurance policy or policies then maintained pursuant to this subparagraph, maintain or obtain an extended reporting period endorsement or equivalent provision in the maximum total aggregate limit of liability required to comply with this subparagraph for a minimum of three years if reasonably available from the insurer.

(B) Maintaining in trust or bank escrow, cash, bank certificates of deposit, United States Treasury obligations, bank letters of credit, or bonds of insurance or surety companies as security for payment
 of liabilities imposed by law for damages arising out of all claims; however, the maximum amount of security for partnerships with five or fewer licensed persons shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for partnerships with more than five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of security shall be obtained for each additional licensee; however, the maximum amount of security is not required to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000). The partnership remains in compliance with this section during a calendar year notwithstanding amounts paid during that calendar year from the accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds in defending, settling, or discharging claims of the type described in this paragraph, provided that the amount of those accounts, funds, Treasury
 obligations, letters of credit, or bonds was at least the amount specified in the preceding sentence as of the first business day of that calendar year. Notwithstanding the pendency of other claims against the partnership, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership shall be deemed to be in compliance with this subparagraph as to a claim if within 30 days after the time that a claim is initially asserted through service of a summons, complaint, or comparable pleading in a judicial or administrative proceeding, the partnership has provided the required amount of security by designating and segregating funds in compliance with the requirements of this subparagraph.

(C) Unless the partnership has satisfied subparagraph (D), each partner of a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited
 liability partnership providing accountancy services, by virtue of that person’s status as a partner, thereby automatically guarantees payment of the difference between the maximum amount of security required for the partnership by this paragraph and the security otherwise provided in accordance with subparagraphs (A) and (B), provided that the aggregate amount paid by all partners under these guarantees shall not exceed the difference. Neither withdrawal by a partner nor the dissolution and winding up of the partnership shall affect the rights or obligations of a partner arising prior to withdrawal or dissolution and winding up, and the guarantee provided for in this subparagraph shall apply only to conduct that occurred prior to the withdrawal or dissolution and winding up. Nothing contained in this subparagraph shall affect or impair the rights or obligations of the partners among themselves, or
 the partnership, including, but not limited to, rights of contribution, subrogation, or indemnification.

(D) Confirming, pursuant to the procedure in subdivision (c), that, as of the most recently completed fiscal year of the partnership, it had a net worth equal to or exceeding ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(2) For claims based upon acts, errors, or omissions arising out of the practice of law, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing legal services shall comply with one, or pursuant to subdivision (b) some combination, of the following:

(A) Each registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing legal services shall maintain
 a policy or policies of insurance against liability imposed on or against it by law for damages arising out of claims; however, the total aggregate limit of liability under the policy or policies of insurance for partnerships with five or fewer licensed persons shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for partnerships with more than five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of insurance shall be obtained for each additional licensee; however, the maximum amount of insurance is not required to exceed seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000) in any one designated period, less amounts paid in defending, settling, or discharging claims as set forth in this subparagraph. The policy or policies may be issued on a claims-made or occurrence basis, and shall cover (i) in the
 case of a claims-made policy, claims initially asserted in the designated period, and (ii) in the case of an occurrence policy, occurrences during the designated period. For purposes of this subparagraph, “designated period” means a policy year or any other period designated in the policy that is not greater than 12 months. The impairment or exhaustion of the aggregate limit of liability by amounts paid under the policy in connection with the settlement, discharge, or defense of claims applicable to a designated period shall not require the partnership to acquire additional insurance coverage for that designated period. The policy or policies of insurance may be in a form reasonably available in the commercial insurance market and may be subject to those terms, conditions, exclusions, and endorsements that are typically contained in those policies. A policy or policies of insurance maintained
 pursuant to this subparagraph may be subject to a deductible or self-insured retention.

Upon the dissolution and winding up of the partnership, the partnership shall, with respect to any insurance policy or policies then maintained pursuant to this subparagraph, maintain or obtain an extended reporting period endorsement or equivalent provision in the maximum total aggregate limit of liability required to comply with this subparagraph for a minimum of three years if reasonably available from the insurer.

(B) Each registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing legal services shall maintain in trust or bank escrow, cash, bank certificates of deposit, United States Treasury obligations, bank letters of credit, or bonds of insurance or surety companies as
 security for payment of liabilities imposed by law for damages arising out of all claims; however, the maximum amount of security for partnerships with five or fewer licensed persons shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for partnerships with more than five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the partnership, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of security shall be obtained for each additional licensee; however, the maximum amount of security is not required to exceed seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000). The partnership remains in compliance with this section during a calendar year notwithstanding amounts paid during that calendar year from the accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds in defending, settling, or discharging claims of the type described in this paragraph, provided that the
 amount of those accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds was at least the amount specified in the preceding sentence as of the first business day of that calendar year. Notwithstanding the pendency of other claims against the partnership, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership shall be deemed to be in compliance with this subparagraph as to a claim if within 30 days after the time that a claim is initially asserted through service of a summons, complaint, or comparable pleading in a judicial or administrative proceeding, the partnership has provided the required amount of security by designating and segregating funds in compliance with the requirement of this subparagraph.

(C) Unless the partnership has satisfied the requirements of subparagraph (D), each partner of a
 registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership providing legal services, by virtue of that person’s status as a partner, thereby automatically guarantees payment of the difference between the maximum amount of security required for the partnership by this paragraph and the security otherwise provided in accordance with the provisions of subparagraphs (A) and (B), provided that the aggregate amount paid by all partners under these guarantees shall not exceed the difference. Neither withdrawal by a partner nor the dissolution and winding up of the partnership shall affect the rights or obligations of a partner arising prior to withdrawal or dissolution and winding up, and the guarantee provided for in this subparagraph shall apply only to conduct that occurred prior to the withdrawal or dissolution and winding up. Nothing contained in this subparagraph shall affect
 or impair the rights or obligations of the partners among themselves, or the partnership, including, but not limited to, rights of contribution, subrogation, or indemnification.
